Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.010

Declaration—Purpose.

(1) It is declared to be the public policy of the state of Washington to promote and facilitate the orderly development and economic stability of its communities. Local governments need the ability to raise revenue to finance public improvements that are designed to encourage economic growth and development in geographic areas characterized by high levels of unemployment and stagnate employment and income growth. The construction of necessary public improvements in accordance with local economic development plans will encourage investment in job-producing private development and expand the public tax base.

(2) It is the purpose of this chapter:

(a) To encourage taxing districts to cooperate in the allocation of future tax revenues that are used to finance public improvements designed to encourage private development in selected areas, in particular in those local governments that are located adjacent to another state or international border;

(b) To assist those local governments that have a competitive disadvantage in its ability to attract business, private investment, or commercial development due to its location near a state or international border; and

(c) To prevent or arrest the decay of selected areas due to the inability of existing financial methods to provide needed public improvements, and to encourage private investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of selected areas.

[ 2001 c 212 s 1.]